Washington statutes.
RCW 19.29.060

Violation of rules by agent, employee or officer—Penalty.

Every officer, agent or employee of any public service company, the state of Washington, or any county, city, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, who shall violate or fail to comply with, or who procures, aids or abets any violation by any public service company, the state of Washington, or any county, city or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, of any provision of this chapter, or who shall fail to obey, observe or comply with any order of the commission [director of labor and industries], pursuant to this chapter, or any provision of any order of the commission [director of labor and industries], or who procures, aids or abets any such public service company, the state of Washington, or any county, city, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, in its failure to obey, observe and comply with any such order or provision, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1913 c 130 s 6; RRS s 5440.] [1954 SLC-RO-29.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: See note following RCW 19.29.050.